apertium-de-nl.de.dix
  <pardef n="Unf/all__n">
     <e>
       <p>
          <l>all</l>
          <r>all<s n="m"/><s n="nom"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
          <l>älle</l>
          <r>all<s n="m"/><s n="nom"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
          <l>all</l>
          <r>all<s n="m"/><s n="acc"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
          <l>älle</l>
          <r>all<s n="m"/><s n="acc"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
          <l>all</l>
          <r>all<s n="m"/><s n="dat"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
          <l>ällen</l>
          <r>all<s n="m"/><s n="dat"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
          <l>all</l>
          <r>all<s n="m"/><s n="gen"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
          <l>älle</l>
          <r>all<s n="m"/><s n="gen"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
   </pardef>

   <pardef n="Beispiel__n">
     <e>
       <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nom"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nom"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="acc"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="acc"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="dat"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="dat"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="gen"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="gen"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Aal__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="m"/><s n="nom"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="m"/><s n="acc"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="m"/><s n="dat"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="m"/><s n="gen"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="m"/><s n="nom"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="m"/><s n="acc"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r><s n="m"/><s n="dat"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
         <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="m"/><s n="gen"/><s n="pl"/></r>
         </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Teller__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nom"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="acc"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="dat"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="gen"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nom"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="acc"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>n</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="dat"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
         <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="gen"/><s n="pl"/></r>
         </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Geist__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nom"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="acc"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="dat"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="gen"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nom"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="acc"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ern</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="dat"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
         <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="gen"/><s n="pl"/></r>
         </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Sozialist__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nom"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="acc"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="dat"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="gen"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nom"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="acc"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="dat"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
         <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="gen"/><s n="pl"/></r>
         </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>in</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nom"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>in</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="acc"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>in</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="dat"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>in</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="gen"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>innen</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nom"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>innen</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="acc"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>innen</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="dat"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
         <p>
          <l>innen</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="gen"/><s n="pl"/></r>
         </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="Aal"><i>Aal</i><par n="Aal__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Apparat"><i>Apparat</i><par n="Aal__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Arm"><i>Arm</i><par n="Aal__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Berg"><i>Berg</i><par n="Aal__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Besuch"><i>Besuch</i><par n="Aal__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Bleistift"><i>Bleistift</i><par n="Aal__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Brief"><i>Brief</i><par n="Aal__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Dieb"><i>Dieb</i><par n="Aal__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Docht"><i>Docht</i><par n="Aal__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Dom"><i>Dom</i><par n="Aal__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Fasan"><i>Fasan</i><par n="Aal__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Film"><i>Film</i><par n="Aal__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Fisch"><i>Fisch</i><par n="Aal__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Freund"><i>Freund</i><par n="Aal__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Grad"><i>Grad</i><par n="Aal__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Huf"><i>Huf</i><par n="Aal__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Hund"><i>Hund</i><par n="Aal__n"/></e>
    <e lm="König"><i>König</i><par n="Aal__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Krieg"><i>Krieg</i><par n="Aal__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Lachs"><i>Lachs</i><par n="Aal__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Lauch"><i>Lauch</i><par n="Aal__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Monat"><i>Monat</i><par n="Aal__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Mond"><i>Mond</i><par n="Aal__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Omnibus"><i>Omnibus</i><par n="Aal__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Pfad"><i>Pfad</i><par n="Aal__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Preis"><i>Preis</i><par n="Aal__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Puls"><i>Puls</i><par n="Aal__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Punkt"><i>Punkt</i><par n="Aal__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Ring"><i>Ring</i><par n="Aal__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Salat"><i>Salat</i><par n="Aal__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Salm"><i>Salm</i><par n="Aal__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Schal"><i>Schal</i><par n="Aal__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Schuh"><i>Schuh</i><par n="Aal__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Star"><i>Star</i><par n="Aal__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Stein"><i>Stein</i><par n="Aal__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Stoff"><i>Stoff</i><par n="Aal__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Tag"><i>Tag</i><par n="Aal__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Teig"><i>Teig</i><par n="Aal__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Teil"><i>Teil</i><par n="Aal__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Thron"><i>Thron</i><par n="Aal__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Tisch"><i>Tisch</i><par n="Aal__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Weg"><i>Weg</i><par n="Aal__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Wind"><i>Wind</i><par n="Aal__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Bein"><i>Bein</i><par n="Beispiel__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Beispiel"><i>Beispiel</i><par n="Beispiel__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Bier"><i>Bier</i><par n="Beispiel__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Brot"><i>Brot</i><par n="Beispiel__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Ding"><i>Ding</i><par n="Beispiel__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Fest"><i>Fest</i><par n="Beispiel__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Gedicht"><i>Gedicht</i><par n="Beispiel__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Geschäft"><i>Geschäft</i><par n="Beispiel__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Geschenk"><i>Geschenk</i><par n="Beispiel__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Heft"><i>Heft</i><par n="Beispiel__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Jahr"><i>Jahr</i><par n="Beispiel__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Klavier"><i>Klavier</i><par n="Beispiel__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Konzert"><i>Konzert</i><par n="Beispiel__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Meer"><i>Meer</i><par n="Beispiel__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Papier"><i>Papier</i><par n="Beispiel__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Pferd"><i>Pferd</i><par n="Beispiel__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Problem"><i>Problem</i><par n="Beispiel__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Produkt"><i>Produkt</i><par n="Beispiel__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Schiff"><i>Schiff</i><par n="Beispiel__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Schwein"><i>Schwein</i><par n="Beispiel__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Spiel"><i>Spiel</i><par n="Beispiel__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Stück"><i>Stück</i><par n="Beispiel__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Telefon"><i>Telefon</i><par n="Beispiel__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Tier"><i>Tier</i><par n="Beispiel__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Wort"><i>Wort</i><par n="Beispiel__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Zeug"><i>Zeug</i><par n="Beispiel__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Teller"><i>Teller</i><par n="Teller__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Keller"><i>Keller</i><par n="Teller__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Kellner"><i>Kellner</i><par n="Teller__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Eimer"><i>Eimer</i><par n="Teller__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Lehrer"><i>Lehrer</i><par n="Teller__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Wagen"><i>Wagen</i><par n="Teller__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Koffer"><i>Koffer</i><par n="Teller__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Fehler"><i>Fehler</i><par n="Teller__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Löffel"><i>Löffel</i><par n="Teller__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Esel"><i>Esel</i><par n="Teller__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Kuchen"><i>Kuchen</i><par n="Teller__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Schüler"><i>Schüler</i><par n="Teller__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Dichter"><i>Dichter</i><par n="Teller__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Braten"><i>Braten</i><par n="Teller__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Finger"><i>Finger</i><par n="Teller__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Geist"><i>Geist</i><par n="Geist__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Bösewicht"><i>Bösewicht</i><par n="Geist__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Sozialist"><i>Sozialist</i><par n="Sozialist__n"/></e>
